Illinois, session 104th, SB1937.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 14-110 and 14-152.1 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/14-110)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 14-110)7    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-813 and 103-34)8    Sec. 14-110. Alternative retirement annuity. 9    (a) Any member who has withdrawn from service with not 10less than 20 years of eligible creditable service and has 11attained age 55, and any member who has withdrawn from service 12with not less than 25 years of eligible creditable service and 13has attained age 50, regardless of whether the attainment of 14either of the specified ages occurs while the member is still 15in service, shall be entitled to receive at the option of the 16member, in lieu of the regular or minimum retirement annuity, 17a retirement annuity computed as follows:18        (i) for periods of service as a noncovered employee: 19    if retirement occurs on or after January 1, 2001, 3% of 20    final average compensation for each year of creditable 21    service; if retirement occurs before January 1, 2001, 2 22    1/4% of final average compensation for each of the first 23    10 years of creditable service, 2 1/2% for each year above   SB1937 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    10 years to and including 20 years of creditable service, 2    and 2 3/4% for each year of creditable service above 20 3    years; and4        (ii) for periods of eligible creditable service as a 5    covered employee: if retirement occurs on or after January 6    1, 2001, 2.5% of final average compensation for each year 7    of creditable service; if retirement occurs before January 8    1, 2001, 1.67% of final average compensation for each of 9    the first 10 years of such service, 1.90% for each of the 10    next 10 years of such service, 2.10% for each year of such 11    service in excess of 20 but not exceeding 30, and 2.30% for 12    each year in excess of 30.13    Such annuity shall be subject to a maximum of 75% of final 14average compensation if retirement occurs before January 1, 152001 or to a maximum of 80% of final average compensation if 16retirement occurs on or after January 1, 2001.17    These rates shall not be applicable to any service 18performed by a member as a covered employee which is not 19eligible creditable service. Service as a covered employee 20which is not eligible creditable service shall be subject to 21the rates and provisions of Section 14-108.22    (a-5) A member who is eligible to receive an alternative 23retirement annuity under this Section may elect to receive an 24estimated payment that shall commence no later than 30 days 25after the later of either the member's last day of employment 26or 30 days after the member files for the retirement benefit   SB1937 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1with the System. The estimated payment shall be the best 2estimate by the System of the total monthly amount due to the 3member based on the information that the System possesses at 4the time of the estimate. If the amount of the estimate is 5greater or less than the actual amount of the monthly annuity, 6the System shall pay or recover the difference within 6 months 7after the start of the monthly annuity. 8    (b) For the purpose of this Section, "eligible creditable 9service" means creditable service resulting from service in 10one or more of the following positions:11        (1) State policeman;12        (2) fire fighter in the fire protection service of a 13    department;14        (3) air pilot;15        (4) special agent;16        (5) investigator for the Secretary of State;17        (6) conservation police officer;18        (7) investigator for the Department of Revenue or the 19    Illinois Gaming Board;20        (8) security employee of the Department of Human 21    Services;22        (9) Central Management Services security police 23    officer;24        (10) security employee of the Department of 25    Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice;26        (11) dangerous drugs investigator;  SB1937 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1        (12) investigator for the Illinois State Police;2        (13) investigator for the Office of the Attorney 3    General;4        (14) controlled substance inspector;5        (15) investigator for the Office of the State's 6    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor;7        (16) Commerce Commission police officer;8        (17) arson investigator;9        (18) State highway maintenance worker;10        (19) security employee of the Department of Innovation 11    and Technology; or 12        (20) transferred employee. 13    A person employed in one of the positions specified in 14this subsection is entitled to eligible creditable service for 15service credit earned under this Article while undergoing the 16basic police training course approved by the Illinois Law 17Enforcement Training Standards Board, if completion of that 18training is required of persons serving in that position. For 19the purposes of this Code, service during the required basic 20police training course shall be deemed performance of the 21duties of the specified position, even though the person is 22not a sworn peace officer at the time of the training.23    A person under paragraph (20) is entitled to eligible 24creditable service for service credit earned under this 25Article on and after his or her transfer by Executive Order No. 262003-10, Executive Order No. 2004-2, or Executive Order No.   SB1937 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b12016-1. 2    (c) For the purposes of this Section:3        (1) The term "State policeman" includes any title or 4    position in the Illinois State Police that is held by an 5    individual employed under the Illinois State Police Act.6        (2) The term "fire fighter in the fire protection 7    service of a department" includes all officers in such 8    fire protection service including fire chiefs and 9    assistant fire chiefs.10        (3) The term "air pilot" includes any employee whose 11    official job description on file in the Department of 12    Central Management Services, or in the department by which 13    he is employed if that department is not covered by the 14    Personnel Code, states that his principal duty is the 15    operation of aircraft, and who possesses a pilot's 16    license; however, the change in this definition made by 17    Public Act 83-842 shall not operate to exclude any 18    noncovered employee who was an "air pilot" for the 19    purposes of this Section on January 1, 1984.20        (4) The term "special agent" means any person who by 21    reason of employment by the Division of Narcotic Control, 22    the Bureau of Investigation or, after July 1, 1977, the 23    Division of Criminal Investigation, the Division of 24    Internal Investigation, the Division of Operations, the 25    Division of Patrol, or any other Division or 26    organizational entity in the Illinois State Police is   SB1937 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    vested by law with duties to maintain public order, 2    investigate violations of the criminal law of this State, 3    enforce the laws of this State, make arrests and recover 4    property. The term "special agent" includes any title or 5    position in the Illinois State Police that is held by an 6    individual employed under the Illinois State Police Act.7        (5) The term "investigator for the Secretary of State" 8    means any person employed by the Office of the Secretary 9    of State and vested with such investigative duties as 10    render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 11    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 12    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.13        A person who became employed as an investigator for 14    the Secretary of State between January 1, 1967 and 15    December 31, 1975, and who has served as such until 16    attainment of age 60, either continuously or with a single 17    break in service of not more than 3 years duration, which 18    break terminated before January 1, 1976, shall be entitled 19    to have his retirement annuity calculated in accordance 20    with subsection (a), notwithstanding that he has less than 21    20 years of credit for such service.22        (6) The term "Conservation Police Officer" means any 23    person employed by the Division of Law Enforcement of the 24    Department of Natural Resources and vested with such law 25    enforcement duties as render him ineligible for coverage 26    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections   SB1937 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. The 2    term "Conservation Police Officer" includes the positions 3    of Chief Conservation Police Administrator and Assistant 4    Conservation Police Administrator.5        (7) The term "investigator for the Department of 6    Revenue" means any person employed by the Department of 7    Revenue and vested with such investigative duties as 8    render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 9    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 10    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.11        The term "investigator for the Illinois Gaming Board" 12    means any person employed as such by the Illinois Gaming 13    Board and vested with such peace officer duties as render 14    the person ineligible for coverage under the Social 15    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 16    218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. 17        (8) The term "security employee of the Department of 18    Human Services" means any person employed by the 19    Department of Human Services who (i) is employed at the 20    Chester Mental Health Center and has daily contact with 21    the residents thereof, (ii) is employed within a security 22    unit at a facility operated by the Department and has 23    daily contact with the residents of the security unit, 24    (iii) is employed at a facility operated by the Department 25    that includes a security unit and is regularly scheduled 26    to work at least 50% of his or her working hours within   SB1937 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    that security unit, or (iv) is a mental health police 2    officer. "Mental health police officer" means any person 3    employed by the Department of Human Services in a position 4    pertaining to the Department's mental health and 5    developmental disabilities functions who is vested with 6    such law enforcement duties as render the person 7    ineligible for coverage under the Social Security Act by 8    reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 9    218(l)(1) of that Act. "Security unit" means that portion 10    of a facility that is devoted to the care, containment, 11    and treatment of persons committed to the Department of 12    Human Services as sexually violent persons, persons unfit 13    to stand trial, or persons not guilty by reason of 14    insanity. With respect to past employment, references to 15    the Department of Human Services include its predecessor, 16    the Department of Mental Health and Developmental 17    Disabilities.18        The changes made to this subdivision (c)(8) by Public 19    Act 92-14 apply to persons who retire on or after January 20    1, 2001, notwithstanding Section 1-103.1.21        (9) "Central Management Services security police 22    officer" means any person employed by the Department of 23    Central Management Services who is vested with such law 24    enforcement duties as render him ineligible for coverage 25    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 26    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.  SB1937 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1        (10) For a member who first became an employee under 2    this Article before July 1, 2005, the term "security 3    employee of the Department of Corrections or the 4    Department of Juvenile Justice" means any employee of the 5    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 6    Justice or the former Department of Personnel, and any 7    member or employee of the Prisoner Review Board, who has 8    daily contact with inmates or youth by working within a 9    correctional facility or Juvenile facility operated by the 10    Department of Juvenile Justice or who is a parole officer 11    or an employee who has direct contact with committed 12    persons in the performance of his or her job duties. For a 13    member who first becomes an employee under this Article on 14    or after July 1, 2005, the term means an employee of the 15    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 16    Justice who is any of the following: (i) officially 17    headquartered at a correctional facility or Juvenile 18    facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice, 19    (ii) a parole officer, (iii) a member of the apprehension 20    unit, (iv) a member of the intelligence unit, (v) a member 21    of the sort team, or (vi) an investigator.22        (11) The term "dangerous drugs investigator" means any 23    person who is employed as such by the Department of Human 24    Services.25        (12) The term "investigator for the Illinois State 26    Police" means a person employed by the Illinois State   SB1937 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    Police who is vested under Section 4 of the Narcotic 2    Control Division Abolition Act with such law enforcement 3    powers as render him ineligible for coverage under the 4    Social Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 5    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.6        (13) "Investigator for the Office of the Attorney 7    General" means any person who is employed as such by the 8    Office of the Attorney General and is vested with such 9    investigative duties as render him ineligible for coverage 10    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 11    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act. For 12    the period before January 1, 1989, the term includes all 13    persons who were employed as investigators by the Office 14    of the Attorney General, without regard to social security 15    status.16        (14) "Controlled substance inspector" means any person 17    who is employed as such by the Department of Professional 18    Regulation and is vested with such law enforcement duties 19    as render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 20    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 21    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act. The term 22    "controlled substance inspector" includes the Program 23    Executive of Enforcement and the Assistant Program 24    Executive of Enforcement.25        (15) The term "investigator for the Office of the 26    State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor" means a person   SB1937 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    employed in that capacity on a full-time basis under the 2    authority of Section 7.06 of the State's Attorneys 3    Appellate Prosecutor's Act.4        (16) "Commerce Commission police officer" means any 5    person employed by the Illinois Commerce Commission who is 6    vested with such law enforcement duties as render him 7    ineligible for coverage under the Social Security Act by 8    reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D), and 9    218(l)(1) of that Act.10        (17) "Arson investigator" means any person who is 11    employed as such by the Office of the State Fire Marshal 12    and is vested with such law enforcement duties as render 13    the person ineligible for coverage under the Social 14    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 15    218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. A person who was 16    employed as an arson investigator on January 1, 1995 and 17    is no longer in service but not yet receiving a retirement 18    annuity may convert his or her creditable service for 19    employment as an arson investigator into eligible 20    creditable service by paying to the System the difference 21    between the employee contributions actually paid for that 22    service and the amounts that would have been contributed 23    if the applicant were contributing at the rate applicable 24    to persons with the same social security status earning 25    eligible creditable service on the date of application.26        (18) The term "State highway maintenance worker" means   SB1937 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    a person who is either of the following:2            (i) A person employed on a full-time basis by the 3        Illinois Department of Transportation in the position 4        of highway maintainer, highway maintenance lead 5        worker, highway maintenance lead/lead worker, heavy 6        construction equipment operator, power shovel 7        operator, or bridge mechanic; and whose principal 8        responsibility is to perform, on the roadway, the 9        actual maintenance necessary to keep the highways that 10        form a part of the State highway system in serviceable 11        condition for vehicular traffic.12            (ii) A person employed on a full-time basis by the 13        Illinois State Toll Highway Authority in the position 14        of equipment operator/laborer H-4, equipment 15        operator/laborer H-6, welder H-4, welder H-6, 16        mechanical/electrical H-4, mechanical/electrical H-6, 17        water/sewer H-4, water/sewer H-6, sign maker/hanger 18        H-4, sign maker/hanger H-6, roadway lighting H-4, 19        roadway lighting H-6, structural H-4, structural H-6, 20        painter H-4, or painter H-6; and whose principal 21        responsibility is to perform, on the roadway, the 22        actual maintenance necessary to keep the Authority's 23        tollways in serviceable condition for vehicular 24        traffic.25        (19) The term "security employee of the Department of 26    Innovation and Technology" means a person who was a   SB1937 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    security employee of the Department of Corrections or the 2    Department of Juvenile Justice, was transferred to the 3    Department of Innovation and Technology pursuant to 4    Executive Order 2016-01, and continues to perform similar 5    job functions under that Department. 6        (20) "Transferred employee" means an employee who was 7    transferred to the Department of Central Management 8    Services by Executive Order No. 2003-10 or Executive Order 9    No. 2004-2 or transferred to the Department of Innovation 10    and Technology by Executive Order No. 2016-1, or both, and 11    was entitled to eligible creditable service for services 12    immediately preceding the transfer. 13    (d) A security employee of the Department of Corrections 14or the Department of Juvenile Justice, a security employee of 15the Department of Human Services who is not a mental health 16police officer, and a security employee of the Department of 17Innovation and Technology shall not be eligible for the 18alternative retirement annuity provided by this Section unless 19he or she meets the following minimum age and service 20requirements at the time of retirement:21        (i) 25 years of eligible creditable service and age 22    55; or23        (ii) beginning January 1, 1987, 25 years of eligible 24    creditable service and age 54, or 24 years of eligible 25    creditable service and age 55; or26        (iii) beginning January 1, 1988, 25 years of eligible   SB1937 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    creditable service and age 53, or 23 years of eligible 2    creditable service and age 55; or3        (iv) beginning January 1, 1989, 25 years of eligible 4    creditable service and age 52, or 22 years of eligible 5    creditable service and age 55; or6        (v) beginning January 1, 1990, 25 years of eligible 7    creditable service and age 51, or 21 years of eligible 8    creditable service and age 55; or9        (vi) beginning January 1, 1991, 25 years of eligible 10    creditable service and age 50, or 20 years of eligible 11    creditable service and age 55.12    Persons who have service credit under Article 16 of this 13Code for service as a security employee of the Department of 14Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 15Department of Human Services in a position requiring 16certification as a teacher may count such service toward 17establishing their eligibility under the service requirements 18of this Section; but such service may be used only for 19establishing such eligibility, and not for the purpose of 20increasing or calculating any benefit.21    (e) If a member enters military service while working in a 22position in which eligible creditable service may be earned, 23and returns to State service in the same or another such 24position, and fulfills in all other respects the conditions 25prescribed in this Article for credit for military service, 26such military service shall be credited as eligible creditable   SB1937 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1service for the purposes of the retirement annuity prescribed 2in this Section.3    (f) For purposes of calculating retirement annuities under 4this Section, periods of service rendered after December 31, 51968 and before October 1, 1975 as a covered employee in the 6position of special agent, conservation police officer, mental 7health police officer, or investigator for the Secretary of 8State, shall be deemed to have been service as a noncovered 9employee, provided that the employee pays to the System prior 10to retirement an amount equal to (1) the difference between 11the employee contributions that would have been required for 12such service as a noncovered employee, and the amount of 13employee contributions actually paid, plus (2) if payment is 14made after July 31, 1987, regular interest on the amount 15specified in item (1) from the date of service to the date of 16payment.17    For purposes of calculating retirement annuities under 18this Section, periods of service rendered after December 31, 191968 and before January 1, 1982 as a covered employee in the 20position of investigator for the Department of Revenue shall 21be deemed to have been service as a noncovered employee, 22provided that the employee pays to the System prior to 23retirement an amount equal to (1) the difference between the 24employee contributions that would have been required for such 25service as a noncovered employee, and the amount of employee 26contributions actually paid, plus (2) if payment is made after   SB1937 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1January 1, 1990, regular interest on the amount specified in 2item (1) from the date of service to the date of payment.3    (g) A State policeman may elect, not later than January 1, 41990, to establish eligible creditable service for up to 10 5years of his service as a policeman under Article 3, by filing 6a written election with the Board, accompanied by payment of 7an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to (i) the 8difference between the amount of employee and employer 9contributions transferred to the System under Section 3-110.5, 10and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 11contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 12policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 13for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 14to the date of payment.15    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 16policeman may elect, not later than July 1, 1993, to establish 17eligible creditable service for up to 10 years of his service 18as a member of the County Police Department under Article 9, by 19filing a written election with the Board, accompanied by 20payment of an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to 21(i) the difference between the amount of employee and employer 22contributions transferred to the System under Section 9-121.10 23and the amounts that would have been contributed had those 24contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 25policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 26for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service   SB1937 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1to the date of payment.2    (h) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 3policeman or investigator for the Secretary of State may elect 4to establish eligible creditable service for up to 12 years of 5his service as a policeman under Article 5, by filing a written 6election with the Board on or before January 31, 1992, and 7paying to the System by January 31, 1994 an amount to be 8determined by the Board, equal to (i) the difference between 9the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 10to the System under Section 5-236, and the amounts that would 11have been contributed had such contributions been made at the 12rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 13thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 14annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.15    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 16policeman, conservation police officer, or investigator for 17the Secretary of State may elect to establish eligible 18creditable service for up to 10 years of service as a sheriff's 19law enforcement employee under Article 7, by filing a written 20election with the Board on or before January 31, 1993, and 21paying to the System by January 31, 1994 an amount to be 22determined by the Board, equal to (i) the difference between 23the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 24to the System under Section 7-139.7, and the amounts that 25would have been contributed had such contributions been made 26at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest   SB1937 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 2annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.3    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 4policeman, conservation police officer, or investigator for 5the Secretary of State may elect to establish eligible 6creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a police 7officer under Article 3, a policeman under Article 5, a 8sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 7, a member 9of the county police department under Article 9, or a police 10officer under Article 15 by filing a written election with the 11Board and paying to the System an amount to be determined by 12the Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 13employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 14under Section 3-110.6, 5-236, 7-139.8, 9-121.10, or 15-134.4 15and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 16contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 17policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 18for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 19to the date of payment.20    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 21investigator for the Office of the Attorney General, or an 22investigator for the Department of Revenue, may elect to 23establish eligible creditable service for up to 5 years of 24service as a police officer under Article 3, a policeman under 25Article 5, a sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 267, or a member of the county police department under Article 9   SB1937 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1by filing a written election with the Board within 6 months 2after August 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 396-745) and paying to the System an amount to be determined by 4the Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 5employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 6under Section 3-110.6, 5-236, 7-139.8, or 9-121.10 and the 7amounts that would have been contributed had such 8contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 9policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 10assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 11of service to the date of payment.12    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 13policeman, conservation police officer, investigator for the 14Office of the Attorney General, an investigator for the 15Department of Revenue, or investigator for the Secretary of 16State may elect to establish eligible creditable service for 17up to 5 years of service as a person employed by a 18participating municipality to perform police duties, or law 19enforcement officer employed on a full-time basis by a forest 20preserve district under Article 7, a county corrections 21officer, or a court services officer under Article 9, by 22filing a written election with the Board within 6 months after 23August 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 96-745) and 24paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board, 25equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 26employer contributions transferred to the System under   SB1937 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1Sections 7-139.8 and 9-121.10 and the amounts that would have 2been contributed had such contributions been made at the rates 3applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at 4the actuarially assumed rate for each year, compounded 5annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.6    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 7policeman, arson investigator, or Commerce Commission police 8officer may elect to establish eligible creditable service for 9up to 5 years of service as a person employed by a 10participating municipality to perform police duties under 11Article 7, a county corrections officer, a court services 12officer under Article 9, or a firefighter under Article 4 by 13filing a written election with the Board within 6 months after 14July 30, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and 15paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board 16equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 17employer contributions transferred to the System under 18Sections 4-108.8, 7-139.8, and 9-121.10 and the amounts that 19would have been contributed had such contributions been made 20at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 21thereon at the actuarially assumed rate for each year, 22compounded annually, from the date of service to the date of 23payment. 24    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 25conservation police officer may elect to establish eligible 26creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a person   SB1937 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1employed by a participating municipality to perform police 2duties under Article 7, a county corrections officer, or a 3court services officer under Article 9 by filing a written 4election with the Board within 6 months after July 30, 2021 5(the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and paying to the 6System an amount to be determined by the Board equal to (i) the 7difference between the amount of employee and employer 8contributions transferred to the System under Sections 7-139.8 9and 9-121.10 and the amounts that would have been contributed 10had such contributions been made at the rates applicable to 11State policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 12assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 13of service to the date of payment. 14    Notwithstanding the limitation in subsection (i), a State 15policeman or conservation police officer may elect to convert 16service credit earned under this Article to eligible 17creditable service, as defined by this Section, by filing a 18written election with the board within 6 months after July 30, 192021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and paying to 20the System an amount to be determined by the Board equal to (i) 21the difference between the amount of employee contributions 22originally paid for that service and the amounts that would 23have been contributed had such contributions been made at the 24rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) the difference 25between the employer's normal cost of the credit prior to the 26conversion authorized by Public Act 102-210 and the employer's   SB1937 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1normal cost of the credit converted in accordance with Public 2Act 102-210, plus (iii) interest thereon at the actuarially 3assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 4of service to the date of payment. 5    (i) The total amount of eligible creditable service 6established by any person under subsections (g), (h), (j), 7(k), (l), (l-5), and (o) of this Section shall not exceed 12 8years.9    (j) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 10investigator for the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 11Prosecutor or a controlled substance inspector may elect to 12establish eligible creditable service for up to 10 years of 13his service as a policeman under Article 3 or a sheriff's law 14enforcement employee under Article 7, by filing a written 15election with the Board, accompanied by payment of an amount 16to be determined by the Board, equal to (1) the difference 17between the amount of employee and employer contributions 18transferred to the System under Section 3-110.6 or 7-139.8, 19and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 20contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 21policemen, plus (2) interest thereon at the effective rate for 22each year, compounded annually, from the date of service to 23the date of payment.24    (k) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 25Section, an alternative formula employee may elect to 26establish eligible creditable service for periods spent as a   SB1937 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1full-time law enforcement officer or full-time corrections 2officer employed by the federal government or by a state or 3local government located outside of Illinois, for which credit 4is not held in any other public employee pension fund or 5retirement system. To obtain this credit, the applicant must 6file a written application with the Board by March 31, 1998, 7accompanied by evidence of eligibility acceptable to the Board 8and payment of an amount to be determined by the Board, equal 9to (1) employee contributions for the credit being 10established, based upon the applicant's salary on the first 11day as an alternative formula employee after the employment 12for which credit is being established and the rates then 13applicable to alternative formula employees, plus (2) an 14amount determined by the Board to be the employer's normal 15cost of the benefits accrued for the credit being established, 16plus (3) regular interest on the amounts in items (1) and (2) 17from the first day as an alternative formula employee after 18the employment for which credit is being established to the 19date of payment.20    (l) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 21security employee of the Department of Corrections may elect, 22not later than July 1, 1998, to establish eligible creditable 23service for up to 10 years of his or her service as a policeman 24under Article 3, by filing a written election with the Board, 25accompanied by payment of an amount to be determined by the 26Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of   SB1937 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 2under Section 3-110.5, and the amounts that would have been 3contributed had such contributions been made at the rates 4applicable to security employees of the Department of 5Corrections, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 6for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 7to the date of payment.8    (l-5) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 9Section, a State policeman may elect to establish eligible 10creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a full-time 11law enforcement officer employed by the federal government or 12by a state or local government located outside of Illinois for 13which credit is not held in any other public employee pension 14fund or retirement system. To obtain this credit, the 15applicant must file a written application with the Board no 16later than 3 years after January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 17Public Act 101-610), accompanied by evidence of eligibility 18acceptable to the Board and payment of an amount to be 19determined by the Board, equal to (1) employee contributions 20for the credit being established, based upon the applicant's 21salary on the first day as an alternative formula employee 22after the employment for which credit is being established and 23the rates then applicable to alternative formula employees, 24plus (2) an amount determined by the Board to be the employer's 25normal cost of the benefits accrued for the credit being 26established, plus (3) regular interest on the amounts in items   SB1937 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1(1) and (2) from the first day as an alternative formula 2employee after the employment for which credit is being 3established to the date of payment. 4    (m) The amendatory changes to this Section made by Public 5Act 94-696 apply only to: (1) security employees of the 6Department of Juvenile Justice employed by the Department of 7Corrections before June 1, 2006 (the effective date of Public 8Act 94-696) and transferred to the Department of Juvenile 9Justice by Public Act 94-696; and (2) persons employed by the 10Department of Juvenile Justice on or after June 1, 2006 (the 11effective date of Public Act 94-696) who are required by 12subsection (b) of Section 3-2.5-15 of the Unified Code of 13Corrections to have any bachelor's or advanced degree from an 14accredited college or university or, in the case of persons 15who provide vocational training, who are required to have 16adequate knowledge in the skill for which they are providing 17the vocational training. 18    (n) A person employed in a position under subsection (b) 19of this Section who has purchased service credit under 20subsection (j) of Section 14-104 or subsection (b) of Section 2114-105 in any other capacity under this Article may convert up 22to 5 years of that service credit into service credit covered 23under this Section by paying to the Fund an amount equal to (1) 24the additional employee contribution required under Section 2514-133, plus (2) the additional employer contribution required 26under Section 14-131, plus (3) interest on items (1) and (2) at   SB1937 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1the actuarially assumed rate from the date of the service to 2the date of payment. 3    (o) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 4conservation police officer, investigator for the Secretary of 5State, Commerce Commission police officer, investigator for 6the Department of Revenue or the Illinois Gaming Board, or 7arson investigator subject to subsection (g) of Section 1-160 8may elect to convert up to 8 years of service credit 9established before January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 10Public Act 101-610) as a conservation police officer, 11investigator for the Secretary of State, Commerce Commission 12police officer, investigator for the Department of Revenue or 13the Illinois Gaming Board, or arson investigator under this 14Article into eligible creditable service by filing a written 15election with the Board no later than one year after January 1, 162020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-610), accompanied 17by payment of an amount to be determined by the Board equal to 18(i) the difference between the amount of the employee 19contributions actually paid for that service and the amount of 20the employee contributions that would have been paid had the 21employee contributions been made as a noncovered employee 22serving in a position in which eligible creditable service, as 23defined in this Section, may be earned, plus (ii) interest 24thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 25annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.26(Source: P.A. 102-210, eff. 7-30-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21;   SB1937 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24.) 2    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-856 and 103-34)3    Sec. 14-110. Alternative retirement annuity. 4    (a) Any member who has withdrawn from service with not 5less than 20 years of eligible creditable service and has 6attained age 55, and any member who has withdrawn from service 7with not less than 25 years of eligible creditable service and 8has attained age 50, regardless of whether the attainment of 9either of the specified ages occurs while the member is still 10in service, shall be entitled to receive at the option of the 11member, in lieu of the regular or minimum retirement annuity, 12a retirement annuity computed as follows:13        (i) for periods of service as a noncovered employee: 14    if retirement occurs on or after January 1, 2001, 3% of 15    final average compensation for each year of creditable 16    service; if retirement occurs before January 1, 2001, 2 17    1/4% of final average compensation for each of the first 18    10 years of creditable service, 2 1/2% for each year above 19    10 years to and including 20 years of creditable service, 20    and 2 3/4% for each year of creditable service above 20 21    years; and22        (ii) for periods of eligible creditable service as a 23    covered employee: if retirement occurs on or after January 24    1, 2001, 2.5% of final average compensation for each year 25    of creditable service; if retirement occurs before January   SB1937 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    1, 2001, 1.67% of final average compensation for each of 2    the first 10 years of such service, 1.90% for each of the 3    next 10 years of such service, 2.10% for each year of such 4    service in excess of 20 but not exceeding 30, and 2.30% for 5    each year in excess of 30.6    Such annuity shall be subject to a maximum of 75% of final 7average compensation if retirement occurs before January 1, 82001 or to a maximum of 80% of final average compensation if 9retirement occurs on or after January 1, 2001.10    These rates shall not be applicable to any service 11performed by a member as a covered employee which is not 12eligible creditable service. Service as a covered employee 13which is not eligible creditable service shall be subject to 14the rates and provisions of Section 14-108.15    (a-5) A member who is eligible to receive an alternative 16retirement annuity under this Section may elect to receive an 17estimated payment that shall commence no later than 30 days 18after the later of either the member's last day of employment 19or 30 days after the member files for the retirement benefit 20with the System. The estimated payment shall be the best 21estimate by the System of the total monthly amount due to the 22member based on the information that the System possesses at 23the time of the estimate. If the amount of the estimate is 24greater or less than the actual amount of the monthly annuity, 25the System shall pay or recover the difference within 6 months 26after the start of the monthly annuity.   SB1937 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    (b) For the purpose of this Section, "eligible creditable 2service" means creditable service resulting from service in 3one or more of the following positions:4        (1) State policeman;5        (2) fire fighter in the fire protection service of a 6    department;7        (3) air pilot;8        (4) special agent;9        (5) investigator for the Secretary of State;10        (6) conservation police officer;11        (7) investigator for the Department of Revenue or the 12    Illinois Gaming Board;13        (8) security employee of the Department of Human 14    Services;15        (9) Central Management Services security police 16    officer;17        (10) security employee of the Department of 18    Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice;19        (11) dangerous drugs investigator;20        (12) investigator for the Illinois State Police;21        (13) investigator for the Office of the Attorney 22    General;23        (14) controlled substance inspector;24        (15) investigator for the Office of the State's 25    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor;26        (16) Commerce Commission police officer;  SB1937 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1        (17) arson investigator;2        (18) State highway maintenance worker;3        (19) security employee of the Department of Innovation 4    and Technology; or 5        (20) transferred employee. 6    A person employed in one of the positions specified in 7this subsection is entitled to eligible creditable service for 8service credit earned under this Article while undergoing the 9basic police training course approved by the Illinois Law 10Enforcement Training Standards Board, if completion of that 11training is required of persons serving in that position. For 12the purposes of this Code, service during the required basic 13police training course shall be deemed performance of the 14duties of the specified position, even though the person is 15not a sworn peace officer at the time of the training.16    A person under paragraph (20) is entitled to eligible 17creditable service for service credit earned under this 18Article on and after his or her transfer by Executive Order No. 192003-10, Executive Order No. 2004-2, or Executive Order No. 202016-1. 21    (c) For the purposes of this Section:22        (1) The term "State policeman" includes any title or 23    position in the Illinois State Police that is held by an 24    individual employed under the Illinois State Police Act.25        (2) The term "fire fighter in the fire protection 26    service of a department" includes all officers in such   SB1937 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    fire protection service including fire chiefs and 2    assistant fire chiefs.3        (3) The term "air pilot" includes any employee whose 4    official job description on file in the Department of 5    Central Management Services, or in the department by which 6    he is employed if that department is not covered by the 7    Personnel Code, states that his principal duty is the 8    operation of aircraft, and who possesses a pilot's 9    license; however, the change in this definition made by 10    Public Act 83-842 shall not operate to exclude any 11    noncovered employee who was an "air pilot" for the 12    purposes of this Section on January 1, 1984.13        (4) The term "special agent" means any person who by 14    reason of employment by the Division of Narcotic Control, 15    the Bureau of Investigation or, after July 1, 1977, the 16    Division of Criminal Investigation, the Division of 17    Internal Investigation, the Division of Operations, the 18    Division of Patrol, or any other Division or 19    organizational entity in the Illinois State Police is 20    vested by law with duties to maintain public order, 21    investigate violations of the criminal law of this State, 22    enforce the laws of this State, make arrests and recover 23    property. The term "special agent" includes any title or 24    position in the Illinois State Police that is held by an 25    individual employed under the Illinois State Police Act.26        (5) The term "investigator for the Secretary of State"   SB1937 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    means any person employed by the Office of the Secretary 2    of State and vested with such investigative duties as 3    render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 4    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 5    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.6        A person who became employed as an investigator for 7    the Secretary of State between January 1, 1967 and 8    December 31, 1975, and who has served as such until 9    attainment of age 60, either continuously or with a single 10    break in service of not more than 3 years duration, which 11    break terminated before January 1, 1976, shall be entitled 12    to have his retirement annuity calculated in accordance 13    with subsection (a), notwithstanding that he has less than 14    20 years of credit for such service.15        (6) The term "Conservation Police Officer" means any 16    person employed by the Division of Law Enforcement of the 17    Department of Natural Resources and vested with such law 18    enforcement duties as render him ineligible for coverage 19    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 20    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. The 21    term "Conservation Police Officer" includes the positions 22    of Chief Conservation Police Administrator and Assistant 23    Conservation Police Administrator.24        (7) The term "investigator for the Department of 25    Revenue" means any person employed by the Department of 26    Revenue and vested with such investigative duties as   SB1937 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 2    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 3    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.4        The term "investigator for the Illinois Gaming Board" 5    means any person employed as such by the Illinois Gaming 6    Board and vested with such peace officer duties as render 7    the person ineligible for coverage under the Social 8    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 9    218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. 10        (8) The term "security employee of the Department of 11    Human Services" means any person employed by the 12    Department of Human Services who (i) is employed at the 13    Chester Mental Health Center and has daily contact with 14    the residents thereof, (ii) is employed within a security 15    unit at a facility operated by the Department and has 16    daily contact with the residents of the security unit, 17    (iii) is employed at a facility operated by the Department 18    that includes a security unit and is regularly scheduled 19    to work at least 50% of his or her working hours within 20    that security unit, or (iv) is a mental health police 21    officer. "Mental health police officer" means any person 22    employed by the Department of Human Services in a position 23    pertaining to the Department's mental health and 24    developmental disabilities functions who is vested with 25    such law enforcement duties as render the person 26    ineligible for coverage under the Social Security Act by   SB1937 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 2    218(l)(1) of that Act. "Security unit" means that portion 3    of a facility that is devoted to the care, containment, 4    and treatment of persons committed to the Department of 5    Human Services as sexually violent persons, persons unfit 6    to stand trial, or persons not guilty by reason of 7    insanity. With respect to past employment, references to 8    the Department of Human Services include its predecessor, 9    the Department of Mental Health and Developmental 10    Disabilities.11        The changes made to this subdivision (c)(8) by Public 12    Act 92-14 apply to persons who retire on or after January 13    1, 2001, notwithstanding Section 1-103.1.14        (9) "Central Management Services security police 15    officer" means any person employed by the Department of 16    Central Management Services who is vested with such law 17    enforcement duties as render him ineligible for coverage 18    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 19    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.20        (10) For a member who first became an employee under 21    this Article before July 1, 2005, the term "security 22    employee of the Department of Corrections or the 23    Department of Juvenile Justice" means any employee of the 24    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 25    Justice or the former Department of Personnel, and any 26    member or employee of the Prisoner Review Board, who has   SB1937 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    daily contact with inmates or youth by working within a 2    correctional facility or Juvenile facility operated by the 3    Department of Juvenile Justice or who is a parole officer 4    or an employee who has direct contact with committed 5    persons in the performance of his or her job duties. For a 6    member who first becomes an employee under this Article on 7    or after July 1, 2005, the term means an employee of the 8    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 9    Justice who is any of the following: (i) officially 10    headquartered at a correctional facility or Juvenile 11    facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice, 12    (ii) a parole officer, (iii) a member of the apprehension 13    unit, (iv) a member of the intelligence unit, (v) a member 14    of the sort team, or (vi) an investigator.15        (11) The term "dangerous drugs investigator" means any 16    person who is employed as such by the Department of Human 17    Services.18        (12) The term "investigator for the Illinois State 19    Police" means a person employed by the Illinois State 20    Police who is vested under Section 4 of the Narcotic 21    Control Division Abolition Act with such law enforcement 22    powers as render him ineligible for coverage under the 23    Social Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 24    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.25        (13) "Investigator for the Office of the Attorney 26    General" means any person who is employed as such by the   SB1937 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    Office of the Attorney General and is vested with such 2    investigative duties as render him ineligible for coverage 3    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 4    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act. For 5    the period before January 1, 1989, the term includes all 6    persons who were employed as investigators by the Office 7    of the Attorney General, without regard to social security 8    status.9        (14) "Controlled substance inspector" means any person 10    who is employed as such by the Department of Professional 11    Regulation and is vested with such law enforcement duties 12    as render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 13    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 14    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act. The term 15    "controlled substance inspector" includes the Program 16    Executive of Enforcement and the Assistant Program 17    Executive of Enforcement.18        (15) The term "investigator for the Office of the 19    State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor" means a person 20    employed in that capacity on a full-time basis under the 21    authority of Section 7.06 of the State's Attorneys 22    Appellate Prosecutor's Act.23        (16) "Commerce Commission police officer" means any 24    person employed by the Illinois Commerce Commission who is 25    vested with such law enforcement duties as render him 26    ineligible for coverage under the Social Security Act by   SB1937 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D), and 2    218(l)(1) of that Act.3        (17) "Arson investigator" means any person who is 4    employed as such by the Office of the State Fire Marshal 5    and is vested with such law enforcement duties as render 6    the person ineligible for coverage under the Social 7    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 8    218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. A person who was 9    employed as an arson investigator on January 1, 1995 and 10    is no longer in service but not yet receiving a retirement 11    annuity may convert his or her creditable service for 12    employment as an arson investigator into eligible 13    creditable service by paying to the System the difference 14    between the employee contributions actually paid for that 15    service and the amounts that would have been contributed 16    if the applicant were contributing at the rate applicable 17    to persons with the same social security status earning 18    eligible creditable service on the date of application.19        (18) The term "State highway maintenance worker" means 20    a person who is either of the following:21            (i) A person employed on a full-time basis by the 22        Illinois Department of Transportation in the position 23        of highway maintainer, highway maintenance lead 24        worker, highway maintenance lead/lead worker, heavy 25        construction equipment operator, power shovel 26        operator, or bridge mechanic; and whose principal   SB1937 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1        responsibility is to perform, on the roadway, the 2        actual maintenance necessary to keep the highways that 3        form a part of the State highway system in serviceable 4        condition for vehicular traffic.5            (ii) A person employed on a full-time basis by the 6        Illinois State Toll Highway Authority in the position 7        of equipment operator/laborer H-4, equipment 8        operator/laborer H-6, welder H-4, welder H-6, 9        mechanical/electrical H-4, mechanical/electrical H-6, 10        water/sewer H-4, water/sewer H-6, sign maker/hanger 11        H-4, sign maker/hanger H-6, roadway lighting H-4, 12        roadway lighting H-6, structural H-4, structural H-6, 13        painter H-4, or painter H-6; and whose principal 14        responsibility is to perform, on the roadway, the 15        actual maintenance necessary to keep the Authority's 16        tollways in serviceable condition for vehicular 17        traffic.18        (19) The term "security employee of the Department of 19    Innovation and Technology" means a person who was a 20    security employee of the Department of Corrections or the 21    Department of Juvenile Justice, was transferred to the 22    Department of Innovation and Technology pursuant to 23    Executive Order 2016-01, and continues to perform similar 24    job functions under that Department. 25        (20) "Transferred employee" means an employee who was 26    transferred to the Department of Central Management   SB1937 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    Services by Executive Order No. 2003-10 or Executive Order 2    No. 2004-2 or transferred to the Department of Innovation 3    and Technology by Executive Order No. 2016-1, or both, and 4    was entitled to eligible creditable service for services 5    immediately preceding the transfer. 6    (d) A security employee of the Department of Corrections 7or the Department of Juvenile Justice, a security employee of 8the Department of Human Services who is not a mental health 9police officer, and a security employee of the Department of 10Innovation and Technology shall not be eligible for the 11alternative retirement annuity provided by this Section unless 12he or she meets the following minimum age and service 13requirements at the time of retirement:14        (i) 25 years of eligible creditable service and age 15    55; or16        (ii) beginning January 1, 1987, 25 years of eligible 17    creditable service and age 54, or 24 years of eligible 18    creditable service and age 55; or19        (iii) beginning January 1, 1988, 25 years of eligible 20    creditable service and age 53, or 23 years of eligible 21    creditable service and age 55; or22        (iv) beginning January 1, 1989, 25 years of eligible 23    creditable service and age 52, or 22 years of eligible 24    creditable service and age 55; or25        (v) beginning January 1, 1990, 25 years of eligible 26    creditable service and age 51, or 21 years of eligible   SB1937 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    creditable service and age 55; or2        (vi) beginning January 1, 1991, 25 years of eligible 3    creditable service and age 50, or 20 years of eligible 4    creditable service and age 55.5    Persons who have service credit under Article 16 of this 6Code for service as a security employee of the Department of 7Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 8Department of Human Services in a position requiring 9certification as a teacher may count such service toward 10establishing their eligibility under the service requirements 11of this Section; but such service may be used only for 12establishing such eligibility, and not for the purpose of 13increasing or calculating any benefit.14    (e) If a member enters military service while working in a 15position in which eligible creditable service may be earned, 16and returns to State service in the same or another such 17position, and fulfills in all other respects the conditions 18prescribed in this Article for credit for military service, 19such military service shall be credited as eligible creditable 20service for the purposes of the retirement annuity prescribed 21in this Section.22    (f) For purposes of calculating retirement annuities under 23this Section, periods of service rendered after December 31, 241968 and before October 1, 1975 as a covered employee in the 25position of special agent, conservation police officer, mental 26health police officer, or investigator for the Secretary of   SB1937 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1State, shall be deemed to have been service as a noncovered 2employee, provided that the employee pays to the System prior 3to retirement an amount equal to (1) the difference between 4the employee contributions that would have been required for 5such service as a noncovered employee, and the amount of 6employee contributions actually paid, plus (2) if payment is 7made after July 31, 1987, regular interest on the amount 8specified in item (1) from the date of service to the date of 9payment.10    For purposes of calculating retirement annuities under 11this Section, periods of service rendered after December 31, 121968 and before January 1, 1982 as a covered employee in the 13position of investigator for the Department of Revenue shall 14be deemed to have been service as a noncovered employee, 15provided that the employee pays to the System prior to 16retirement an amount equal to (1) the difference between the 17employee contributions that would have been required for such 18service as a noncovered employee, and the amount of employee 19contributions actually paid, plus (2) if payment is made after 20January 1, 1990, regular interest on the amount specified in 21item (1) from the date of service to the date of payment.22    (g) A State policeman may elect, not later than January 1, 231990, to establish eligible creditable service for up to 10 24years of his service as a policeman under Article 3, by filing 25a written election with the Board, accompanied by payment of 26an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to (i) the   SB1937 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1difference between the amount of employee and employer 2contributions transferred to the System under Section 3-110.5, 3and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 4contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 5policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 6for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 7to the date of payment.8    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 9policeman may elect, not later than July 1, 1993, to establish 10eligible creditable service for up to 10 years of his service 11as a member of the County Police Department under Article 9, by 12filing a written election with the Board, accompanied by 13payment of an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to 14(i) the difference between the amount of employee and employer 15contributions transferred to the System under Section 9-121.10 16and the amounts that would have been contributed had those 17contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 18policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 19for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 20to the date of payment.21    (h) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 22policeman or investigator for the Secretary of State may elect 23to establish eligible creditable service for up to 12 years of 24his service as a policeman under Article 5, by filing a written 25election with the Board on or before January 31, 1992, and 26paying to the System by January 31, 1994 an amount to be   SB1937 Engrossed- 43 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1determined by the Board, equal to (i) the difference between 2the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 3to the System under Section 5-236, and the amounts that would 4have been contributed had such contributions been made at the 5rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 6thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 7annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.8    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 9policeman, conservation police officer, or investigator for 10the Secretary of State may elect to establish eligible 11creditable service for up to 10 years of service as a sheriff's 12law enforcement employee under Article 7, by filing a written 13election with the Board on or before January 31, 1993, and 14paying to the System by January 31, 1994 an amount to be 15determined by the Board, equal to (i) the difference between 16the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 17to the System under Section 7-139.7, and the amounts that 18would have been contributed had such contributions been made 19at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 20thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 21annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.22    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 23policeman, conservation police officer, or investigator for 24the Secretary of State may elect to establish eligible 25creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a police 26officer under Article 3, a policeman under Article 5, a   SB1937 Engrossed- 44 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 7, a member 2of the county police department under Article 9, or a police 3officer under Article 15 by filing a written election with the 4Board and paying to the System an amount to be determined by 5the Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 6employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 7under Section 3-110.6, 5-236, 7-139.8, 9-121.10, or 15-134.4 8and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 9contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 10policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 11for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 12to the date of payment.13    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 14investigator for the Office of the Attorney General, or an 15investigator for the Department of Revenue, may elect to 16establish eligible creditable service for up to 5 years of 17service as a police officer under Article 3, a policeman under 18Article 5, a sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 197, or a member of the county police department under Article 9 20by filing a written election with the Board within 6 months 21after August 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 2296-745) and paying to the System an amount to be determined by 23the Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 24employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 25under Section 3-110.6, 5-236, 7-139.8, or 9-121.10 and the 26amounts that would have been contributed had such   SB1937 Engrossed- 45 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 2policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 3assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 4of service to the date of payment.5    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 6policeman, conservation police officer, investigator for the 7Office of the Attorney General, an investigator for the 8Department of Revenue, or investigator for the Secretary of 9State may elect to establish eligible creditable service for 10up to 5 years of service as a person employed by a 11participating municipality to perform police duties, or law 12enforcement officer employed on a full-time basis by a forest 13preserve district under Article 7, a county corrections 14officer, or a court services officer under Article 9, by 15filing a written election with the Board within 6 months after 16August 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 96-745) and 17paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board, 18equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 19employer contributions transferred to the System under 20Sections 7-139.8 and 9-121.10 and the amounts that would have 21been contributed had such contributions been made at the rates 22applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at 23the actuarially assumed rate for each year, compounded 24annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.25    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 26policeman, arson investigator, or Commerce Commission police   SB1937 Engrossed- 46 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1officer may elect to establish eligible creditable service for 2up to 5 years of service as a person employed by a 3participating municipality to perform police duties under 4Article 7, a county corrections officer, a court services 5officer under Article 9, or a firefighter under Article 4 by 6filing a written election with the Board within 6 months after 7July 30, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and 8paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board 9equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 10employer contributions transferred to the System under 11Sections 4-108.8, 7-139.8, and 9-121.10 and the amounts that 12would have been contributed had such contributions been made 13at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 14thereon at the actuarially assumed rate for each year, 15compounded annually, from the date of service to the date of 16payment. 17    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 18conservation police officer may elect to establish eligible 19creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a person 20employed by a participating municipality to perform police 21duties under Article 7, a county corrections officer, or a 22court services officer under Article 9 by filing a written 23election with the Board within 6 months after July 30, 2021 24(the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and paying to the 25System an amount to be determined by the Board equal to (i) the 26difference between the amount of employee and employer   SB1937 Engrossed- 47 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1contributions transferred to the System under Sections 7-139.8 2and 9-121.10 and the amounts that would have been contributed 3had such contributions been made at the rates applicable to 4State policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 5assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 6of service to the date of payment. 7    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 8investigator for the Department of Revenue, investigator for 9the Illinois Gaming Board, investigator for the Secretary of 10State, or arson investigator may elect to establish eligible 11creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a person 12employed by a participating municipality to perform police 13duties under Article 7, a county corrections officer, a court 14services officer under Article 9, or a firefighter under 15Article 4 by filing a written election with the Board within 6 16months after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 17102nd General Assembly and paying to the System an amount to be 18determined by the Board equal to (i) the difference between 19the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 20to the System under Sections 4-108.8, 7-139.8, and 9-121.10 21and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 22contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 23policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 24assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 25of service to the date of payment. 26    Notwithstanding the limitation in subsection (i), a State   SB1937 Engrossed- 48 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1policeman or conservation police officer may elect to convert 2service credit earned under this Article to eligible 3creditable service, as defined by this Section, by filing a 4written election with the board within 6 months after July 30, 52021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and paying to 6the System an amount to be determined by the Board equal to (i) 7the difference between the amount of employee contributions 8originally paid for that service and the amounts that would 9have been contributed had such contributions been made at the 10rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) the difference 11between the employer's normal cost of the credit prior to the 12conversion authorized by Public Act 102-210 and the employer's 13normal cost of the credit converted in accordance with Public 14Act 102-210, plus (iii) interest thereon at the actuarially 15assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 16of service to the date of payment. 17    Notwithstanding the limitation in subsection (i), an 18investigator for the Department of Revenue, investigator for 19the Illinois Gaming Board, investigator for the Secretary of 20State, or arson investigator may elect to convert service 21credit earned under this Article to eligible creditable 22service, as defined by this Section, by filing a written 23election with the Board within 6 months after the effective 24date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly and 25paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board 26equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee   SB1937 Engrossed- 49 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1contributions originally paid for that service and the amounts 2that would have been contributed had such contributions been 3made at the rates applicable to investigators for the 4Department of Revenue, investigators for the Illinois Gaming 5Board, investigators for the Secretary of State, or arson 6investigators, plus (ii) the difference between the employer's 7normal cost of the credit prior to the conversion authorized 8by this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly and the 9employer's normal cost of the credit converted in accordance 10with this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, plus 11(iii) interest thereon at the actuarially assumed rate for 12each year, compounded annually, from the date of service to 13the date of payment. 14    (i) The total amount of eligible creditable service 15established by any person under subsections (g), (h), (j), 16(k), (l), (l-5), and (o) of this Section shall not exceed 12 17years.18    (j) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 19investigator for the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 20Prosecutor or a controlled substance inspector may elect to 21establish eligible creditable service for up to 10 years of 22his service as a policeman under Article 3 or a sheriff's law 23enforcement employee under Article 7, by filing a written 24election with the Board, accompanied by payment of an amount 25to be determined by the Board, equal to (1) the difference 26between the amount of employee and employer contributions   SB1937 Engrossed- 50 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1transferred to the System under Section 3-110.6 or 7-139.8, 2and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 3contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 4policemen, plus (2) interest thereon at the effective rate for 5each year, compounded annually, from the date of service to 6the date of payment.7    (k) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 8Section, an alternative formula employee may elect to 9establish eligible creditable service for periods spent as a 10full-time law enforcement officer or full-time corrections 11officer employed by the federal government or by a state or 12local government located outside of Illinois, for which credit 13is not held in any other public employee pension fund or 14retirement system. To obtain this credit, the applicant must 15file a written application with the Board by March 31, 1998, 16accompanied by evidence of eligibility acceptable to the Board 17and payment of an amount to be determined by the Board, equal 18to (1) employee contributions for the credit being 19established, based upon the applicant's salary on the first 20day as an alternative formula employee after the employment 21for which credit is being established and the rates then 22applicable to alternative formula employees, plus (2) an 23amount determined by the Board to be the employer's normal 24cost of the benefits accrued for the credit being established, 25plus (3) regular interest on the amounts in items (1) and (2) 26from the first day as an alternative formula employee after   SB1937 Engrossed- 51 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1the employment for which credit is being established to the 2date of payment.3    (l) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 4security employee of the Department of Corrections may elect, 5not later than July 1, 1998, to establish eligible creditable 6service for up to 10 years of his or her service as a policeman 7under Article 3, by filing a written election with the Board, 8accompanied by payment of an amount to be determined by the 9Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 10employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 11under Section 3-110.5, and the amounts that would have been 12contributed had such contributions been made at the rates 13applicable to security employees of the Department of 14Corrections, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 15for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 16to the date of payment.17    (l-5) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 18Section, a State policeman may elect to establish eligible 19creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a full-time 20law enforcement officer employed by the federal government or 21by a state or local government located outside of Illinois for 22which credit is not held in any other public employee pension 23fund or retirement system. To obtain this credit, the 24applicant must file a written application with the Board no 25later than 3 years after January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 26Public Act 101-610), accompanied by evidence of eligibility   SB1937 Engrossed- 52 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1acceptable to the Board and payment of an amount to be 2determined by the Board, equal to (1) employee contributions 3for the credit being established, based upon the applicant's 4salary on the first day as an alternative formula employee 5after the employment for which credit is being established and 6the rates then applicable to alternative formula employees, 7plus (2) an amount determined by the Board to be the employer's 8normal cost of the benefits accrued for the credit being 9established, plus (3) regular interest on the amounts in items 10(1) and (2) from the first day as an alternative formula 11employee after the employment for which credit is being 12established to the date of payment. 13    (m) The amendatory changes to this Section made by Public 14Act 94-696 apply only to: (1) security employees of the 15Department of Juvenile Justice employed by the Department of 16Corrections before June 1, 2006 (the effective date of Public 17Act 94-696) and transferred to the Department of Juvenile 18Justice by Public Act 94-696; and (2) persons employed by the 19Department of Juvenile Justice on or after June 1, 2006 (the 20effective date of Public Act 94-696) who are required by 21subsection (b) of Section 3-2.5-15 of the Unified Code of 22Corrections to have any bachelor's or advanced degree from an 23accredited college or university or, in the case of persons 24who provide vocational training, who are required to have 25adequate knowledge in the skill for which they are providing 26the vocational training.   SB1937 Engrossed- 53 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    (n) A person employed in a position under subsection (b) 2of this Section who has purchased service credit under 3subsection (j) of Section 14-104 or subsection (b) of Section 414-105 in any other capacity under this Article may convert up 5to 5 years of that service credit into service credit covered 6under this Section by paying to the Fund an amount equal to (1) 7the additional employee contribution required under Section 814-133, plus (2) the additional employer contribution required 9under Section 14-131, plus (3) interest on items (1) and (2) at 10the actuarially assumed rate from the date of the service to 11the date of payment. 12    (o) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 13conservation police officer, investigator for the Secretary of 14State, Commerce Commission police officer, investigator for 15the Department of Revenue or the Illinois Gaming Board, or 16arson investigator subject to subsection (g) of Section 1-160 17may elect to convert up to 8 years of service credit 18established before January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 19Public Act 101-610) as a conservation police officer, 20investigator for the Secretary of State, Commerce Commission 21police officer, investigator for the Department of Revenue or 22the Illinois Gaming Board, or arson investigator under this 23Article into eligible creditable service by filing a written 24election with the Board no later than one year after January 1, 252020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-610), accompanied 26by payment of an amount to be determined by the Board equal to   SB1937 Engrossed- 54 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1(i) the difference between the amount of the employee 2contributions actually paid for that service and the amount of 3the employee contributions that would have been paid had the 4employee contributions been made as a noncovered employee 5serving in a position in which eligible creditable service, as 6defined in this Section, may be earned, plus (ii) interest 7thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 8annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.9(Source: P.A. 102-210, eff. 7-30-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 10102-856, eff. 1-1-23; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24.) 11    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-956 and 103-34)12    Sec. 14-110. Alternative retirement annuity. 13    (a) Any member who has withdrawn from service with not 14less than 20 years of eligible creditable service and has 15attained age 55, and any member who has withdrawn from service 16with not less than 25 years of eligible creditable service and 17has attained age 50, regardless of whether the attainment of 18either of the specified ages occurs while the member is still 19in service, shall be entitled to receive at the option of the 20member, in lieu of the regular or minimum retirement annuity, 21a retirement annuity computed as follows:22        (i) for periods of service as a noncovered employee: 23    if retirement occurs on or after January 1, 2001, 3% of 24    final average compensation for each year of creditable 25    service; if retirement occurs before January 1, 2001, 2   SB1937 Engrossed- 55 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    1/4% of final average compensation for each of the first 2    10 years of creditable service, 2 1/2% for each year above 3    10 years to and including 20 years of creditable service, 4    and 2 3/4% for each year of creditable service above 20 5    years; and6        (ii) for periods of eligible creditable service as a 7    covered employee: if retirement occurs on or after January 8    1, 2001, 2.5% of final average compensation for each year 9    of creditable service; if retirement occurs before January 10    1, 2001, 1.67% of final average compensation for each of 11    the first 10 years of such service, 1.90% for each of the 12    next 10 years of such service, 2.10% for each year of such 13    service in excess of 20 but not exceeding 30, and 2.30% for 14    each year in excess of 30.15    Such annuity shall be subject to a maximum of 75% of final 16average compensation if retirement occurs before January 1, 172001 or to a maximum of 80% of final average compensation if 18retirement occurs on or after January 1, 2001.19    These rates shall not be applicable to any service 20performed by a member as a covered employee which is not 21eligible creditable service. Service as a covered employee 22which is not eligible creditable service shall be subject to 23the rates and provisions of Section 14-108.24    (a-5) A member who is eligible to receive an alternative 25retirement annuity under this Section may elect to receive an 26estimated payment that shall commence no later than 30 days   SB1937 Engrossed- 56 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1after the later of either the member's last day of employment 2or 30 days after the member files for the retirement benefit 3with the System. The estimated payment shall be the best 4estimate by the System of the total monthly amount due to the 5member based on the information that the System possesses at 6the time of the estimate. If the amount of the estimate is 7greater or less than the actual amount of the monthly annuity, 8the System shall pay or recover the difference within 6 months 9after the start of the monthly annuity. 10    (b) For the purpose of this Section, "eligible creditable 11service" means creditable service resulting from service in 12one or more of the following positions:13        (1) State policeman;14        (2) fire fighter in the fire protection service of a 15    department;16        (3) air pilot;17        (4) special agent;18        (5) investigator for the Secretary of State;19        (6) conservation police officer;20        (7) investigator for the Department of Revenue or the 21    Illinois Gaming Board;22        (8) security employee of the Department of Human 23    Services;24        (9) Central Management Services security police 25    officer;26        (10) security employee of the Department of   SB1937 Engrossed- 57 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice;2        (11) dangerous drugs investigator;3        (12) investigator for the Illinois State Police;4        (13) investigator for the Office of the Attorney 5    General;6        (14) controlled substance inspector;7        (15) investigator for the Office of the State's 8    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor;9        (16) Commerce Commission police officer;10        (17) arson investigator;11        (18) State highway maintenance worker;12        (19) security employee of the Department of Innovation 13    and Technology; or 14        (20) transferred employee. 15    A person employed in one of the positions specified in 16this subsection is entitled to eligible creditable service for 17service credit earned under this Article while undergoing the 18basic police training course approved by the Illinois Law 19Enforcement Training Standards Board, if completion of that 20training is required of persons serving in that position. For 21the purposes of this Code, service during the required basic 22police training course shall be deemed performance of the 23duties of the specified position, even though the person is 24not a sworn peace officer at the time of the training.25    A person under paragraph (20) is entitled to eligible 26creditable service for service credit earned under this   SB1937 Engrossed- 58 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1Article on and after his or her transfer by Executive Order No. 22003-10, Executive Order No. 2004-2, or Executive Order No. 32016-1. 4    (c) For the purposes of this Section:5        (1) The term "State policeman" includes any title or 6    position in the Illinois State Police that is held by an 7    individual employed under the Illinois State Police Act.8        (2) The term "fire fighter in the fire protection 9    service of a department" includes all officers in such 10    fire protection service including fire chiefs and 11    assistant fire chiefs.12        (3) The term "air pilot" includes any employee whose 13    official job description on file in the Department of 14    Central Management Services, or in the department by which 15    he is employed if that department is not covered by the 16    Personnel Code, states that his principal duty is the 17    operation of aircraft, and who possesses a pilot's 18    license; however, the change in this definition made by 19    Public Act 83-842 shall not operate to exclude any 20    noncovered employee who was an "air pilot" for the 21    purposes of this Section on January 1, 1984.22        (4) The term "special agent" means any person who by 23    reason of employment by the Division of Narcotic Control, 24    the Bureau of Investigation or, after July 1, 1977, the 25    Division of Criminal Investigation, the Division of 26    Internal Investigation, the Division of Operations, the   SB1937 Engrossed- 59 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    Division of Patrol, or any other Division or 2    organizational entity in the Illinois State Police is 3    vested by law with duties to maintain public order, 4    investigate violations of the criminal law of this State, 5    enforce the laws of this State, make arrests and recover 6    property. The term "special agent" includes any title or 7    position in the Illinois State Police that is held by an 8    individual employed under the Illinois State Police Act.9        (5) The term "investigator for the Secretary of State" 10    means any person employed by the Office of the Secretary 11    of State and vested with such investigative duties as 12    render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 13    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 14    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.15        A person who became employed as an investigator for 16    the Secretary of State between January 1, 1967 and 17    December 31, 1975, and who has served as such until 18    attainment of age 60, either continuously or with a single 19    break in service of not more than 3 years duration, which 20    break terminated before January 1, 1976, shall be entitled 21    to have his retirement annuity calculated in accordance 22    with subsection (a), notwithstanding that he has less than 23    20 years of credit for such service.24        (6) The term "Conservation Police Officer" means any 25    person employed by the Division of Law Enforcement of the 26    Department of Natural Resources and vested with such law   SB1937 Engrossed- 60 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    enforcement duties as render him ineligible for coverage 2    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 3    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. The 4    term "Conservation Police Officer" includes the positions 5    of Chief Conservation Police Administrator and Assistant 6    Conservation Police Administrator.7        (7) The term "investigator for the Department of 8    Revenue" means any person employed by the Department of 9    Revenue and vested with such investigative duties as 10    render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 11    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 12    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.13        The term "investigator for the Illinois Gaming Board" 14    means any person employed as such by the Illinois Gaming 15    Board and vested with such peace officer duties as render 16    the person ineligible for coverage under the Social 17    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 18    218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. 19        (8) The term "security employee of the Department of 20    Human Services" means any person employed by the 21    Department of Human Services who (i) is employed at the 22    Chester Mental Health Center and has daily contact with 23    the residents thereof, (ii) is employed within a security 24    unit at a facility operated by the Department and has 25    daily contact with the residents of the security unit, 26    (iii) is employed at a facility operated by the Department   SB1937 Engrossed- 61 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    that includes a security unit and is regularly scheduled 2    to work at least 50% of his or her working hours within 3    that security unit, or (iv) is a mental health police 4    officer. "Mental health police officer" means any person 5    employed by the Department of Human Services in a position 6    pertaining to the Department's mental health and 7    developmental disabilities functions who is vested with 8    such law enforcement duties as render the person 9    ineligible for coverage under the Social Security Act by 10    reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 11    218(l)(1) of that Act. "Security unit" means that portion 12    of a facility that is devoted to the care, containment, 13    and treatment of persons committed to the Department of 14    Human Services as sexually violent persons, persons unfit 15    to stand trial, or persons not guilty by reason of 16    insanity. With respect to past employment, references to 17    the Department of Human Services include its predecessor, 18    the Department of Mental Health and Developmental 19    Disabilities.20        The changes made to this subdivision (c)(8) by Public 21    Act 92-14 apply to persons who retire on or after January 22    1, 2001, notwithstanding Section 1-103.1.23        (9) "Central Management Services security police 24    officer" means any person employed by the Department of 25    Central Management Services who is vested with such law 26    enforcement duties as render him ineligible for coverage   SB1937 Engrossed- 62 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 2    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.3        (10) For a member who first became an employee under 4    this Article before July 1, 2005, the term "security 5    employee of the Department of Corrections or the 6    Department of Juvenile Justice" means any employee of the 7    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 8    Justice or the former Department of Personnel, and any 9    member or employee of the Prisoner Review Board, who has 10    daily contact with inmates or youth by working within a 11    correctional facility or Juvenile facility operated by the 12    Department of Juvenile Justice or who is a parole officer 13    or an employee who has direct contact with committed 14    persons in the performance of his or her job duties. For a 15    member who first becomes an employee under this Article on 16    or after July 1, 2005, the term means an employee of the 17    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 18    Justice who is any of the following: (i) officially 19    headquartered at a correctional facility or Juvenile 20    facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice, 21    (ii) a parole officer, (iii) a member of the apprehension 22    unit, (iv) a member of the intelligence unit, (v) a member 23    of the sort team, or (vi) an investigator.24        (11) The term "dangerous drugs investigator" means any 25    person who is employed as such by the Department of Human 26    Services.  SB1937 Engrossed- 63 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1        (12) The term "investigator for the Illinois State 2    Police" means a person employed by the Illinois State 3    Police who is vested under Section 4 of the Narcotic 4    Control Division Abolition Act with such law enforcement 5    powers as render him ineligible for coverage under the 6    Social Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 7    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act.8        (13) "Investigator for the Office of the Attorney 9    General" means any person who is employed as such by the 10    Office of the Attorney General and is vested with such 11    investigative duties as render him ineligible for coverage 12    under the Social Security Act by reason of Sections 13    218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act. For 14    the period before January 1, 1989, the term includes all 15    persons who were employed as investigators by the Office 16    of the Attorney General, without regard to social security 17    status.18        (14) "Controlled substance inspector" means any person 19    who is employed as such by the Department of Professional 20    Regulation and is vested with such law enforcement duties 21    as render him ineligible for coverage under the Social 22    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 23    218(d)(8)(D) and 218(l)(1) of that Act. The term 24    "controlled substance inspector" includes the Program 25    Executive of Enforcement and the Assistant Program 26    Executive of Enforcement.  SB1937 Engrossed- 64 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1        (15) The term "investigator for the Office of the 2    State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor" means a person 3    employed in that capacity on a full-time basis under the 4    authority of Section 7.06 of the State's Attorneys 5    Appellate Prosecutor's Act.6        (16) "Commerce Commission police officer" means any 7    person employed by the Illinois Commerce Commission who is 8    vested with such law enforcement duties as render him 9    ineligible for coverage under the Social Security Act by 10    reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 218(d)(8)(D), and 11    218(l)(1) of that Act.12        (17) "Arson investigator" means any person who is 13    employed as such by the Office of the State Fire Marshal 14    and is vested with such law enforcement duties as render 15    the person ineligible for coverage under the Social 16    Security Act by reason of Sections 218(d)(5)(A), 17    218(d)(8)(D), and 218(l)(1) of that Act. A person who was 18    employed as an arson investigator on January 1, 1995 and 19    is no longer in service but not yet receiving a retirement 20    annuity may convert his or her creditable service for 21    employment as an arson investigator into eligible 22    creditable service by paying to the System the difference 23    between the employee contributions actually paid for that 24    service and the amounts that would have been contributed 25    if the applicant were contributing at the rate applicable 26    to persons with the same social security status earning   SB1937 Engrossed- 65 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    eligible creditable service on the date of application.2        (18) The term "State highway maintenance worker" means 3    a person who is either of the following:4            (i) A person employed on a full-time basis by the 5        Illinois Department of Transportation in the position 6        of highway maintainer, highway maintenance lead 7        worker, highway maintenance lead/lead worker, heavy 8        construction equipment operator, power shovel 9        operator, or bridge mechanic; and whose principal 10        responsibility is to perform, on the roadway, the 11        actual maintenance necessary to keep the highways that 12        form a part of the State highway system in serviceable 13        condition for vehicular traffic.14            (ii) A person employed on a full-time basis by the 15        Illinois State Toll Highway Authority in the position 16        of equipment operator/laborer H-4, equipment 17        operator/laborer H-6, welder H-4, welder H-6, 18        mechanical/electrical H-4, mechanical/electrical H-6, 19        water/sewer H-4, water/sewer H-6, sign maker/hanger 20        H-4, sign maker/hanger H-6, roadway lighting H-4, 21        roadway lighting H-6, structural H-4, structural H-6, 22        painter H-4, or painter H-6; and whose principal 23        responsibility is to perform, on the roadway, the 24        actual maintenance necessary to keep the Authority's 25        tollways in serviceable condition for vehicular 26        traffic.  SB1937 Engrossed- 66 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1        (19) The term "security employee of the Department of 2    Innovation and Technology" means a person who was a 3    security employee of the Department of Corrections or the 4    Department of Juvenile Justice, was transferred to the 5    Department of Innovation and Technology pursuant to 6    Executive Order 2016-01, and continues to perform similar 7    job functions under that Department. 8        (20) "Transferred employee" means an employee who was 9    transferred to the Department of Central Management 10    Services by Executive Order No. 2003-10 or Executive Order 11    No. 2004-2 or transferred to the Department of Innovation 12    and Technology by Executive Order No. 2016-1, or both, and 13    was entitled to eligible creditable service for services 14    immediately preceding the transfer. 15    (d) A security employee of the Department of Corrections 16or the Department of Juvenile Justice, a security employee of 17the Department of Human Services who is not a mental health 18police officer, and a security employee of the Department of 19Innovation and Technology shall not be eligible for the 20alternative retirement annuity provided by this Section unless 21he or she meets the following minimum age and service 22requirements at the time of retirement:23        (i) 25 years of eligible creditable service and age 24    55; or25        (ii) beginning January 1, 1987, 25 years of eligible 26    creditable service and age 54, or 24 years of eligible   SB1937 Engrossed- 67 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    creditable service and age 55; or2        (iii) beginning January 1, 1988, 25 years of eligible 3    creditable service and age 53, or 23 years of eligible 4    creditable service and age 55; or5        (iv) beginning January 1, 1989, 25 years of eligible 6    creditable service and age 52, or 22 years of eligible 7    creditable service and age 55; or8        (v) beginning January 1, 1990, 25 years of eligible 9    creditable service and age 51, or 21 years of eligible 10    creditable service and age 55; or11        (vi) beginning January 1, 1991, 25 years of eligible 12    creditable service and age 50, or 20 years of eligible 13    creditable service and age 55.14    Persons who have service credit under Article 16 of this 15Code for service as a security employee of the Department of 16Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 17Department of Human Services in a position requiring 18certification as a teacher may count such service toward 19establishing their eligibility under the service requirements 20of this Section; but such service may be used only for 21establishing such eligibility, and not for the purpose of 22increasing or calculating any benefit.23    (e) If a member enters military service while working in a 24position in which eligible creditable service may be earned, 25and returns to State service in the same or another such 26position, and fulfills in all other respects the conditions   SB1937 Engrossed- 68 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1prescribed in this Article for credit for military service, 2such military service shall be credited as eligible creditable 3service for the purposes of the retirement annuity prescribed 4in this Section.5    (f) For purposes of calculating retirement annuities under 6this Section, periods of service rendered after December 31, 71968 and before October 1, 1975 as a covered employee in the 8position of special agent, conservation police officer, mental 9health police officer, or investigator for the Secretary of 10State, shall be deemed to have been service as a noncovered 11employee, provided that the employee pays to the System prior 12to retirement an amount equal to (1) the difference between 13the employee contributions that would have been required for 14such service as a noncovered employee, and the amount of 15employee contributions actually paid, plus (2) if payment is 16made after July 31, 1987, regular interest on the amount 17specified in item (1) from the date of service to the date of 18payment.19    For purposes of calculating retirement annuities under 20this Section, periods of service rendered after December 31, 211968 and before January 1, 1982 as a covered employee in the 22position of investigator for the Department of Revenue shall 23be deemed to have been service as a noncovered employee, 24provided that the employee pays to the System prior to 25retirement an amount equal to (1) the difference between the 26employee contributions that would have been required for such   SB1937 Engrossed- 69 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1service as a noncovered employee, and the amount of employee 2contributions actually paid, plus (2) if payment is made after 3January 1, 1990, regular interest on the amount specified in 4item (1) from the date of service to the date of payment.5    (g) A State policeman may elect, not later than January 1, 61990, to establish eligible creditable service for up to 10 7years of his service as a policeman under Article 3, by filing 8a written election with the Board, accompanied by payment of 9an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to (i) the 10difference between the amount of employee and employer 11contributions transferred to the System under Section 3-110.5, 12and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 13contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 14policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 15for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 16to the date of payment.17    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 18policeman may elect, not later than July 1, 1993, to establish 19eligible creditable service for up to 10 years of his service 20as a member of the County Police Department under Article 9, by 21filing a written election with the Board, accompanied by 22payment of an amount to be determined by the Board, equal to 23(i) the difference between the amount of employee and employer 24contributions transferred to the System under Section 9-121.10 25and the amounts that would have been contributed had those 26contributions been made at the rates applicable to State   SB1937 Engrossed- 70 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 2for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 3to the date of payment.4    (h) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 5policeman or investigator for the Secretary of State may elect 6to establish eligible creditable service for up to 12 years of 7his service as a policeman under Article 5, by filing a written 8election with the Board on or before January 31, 1992, and 9paying to the System by January 31, 1994 an amount to be 10determined by the Board, equal to (i) the difference between 11the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 12to the System under Section 5-236, and the amounts that would 13have been contributed had such contributions been made at the 14rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 15thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 16annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.17    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 18policeman, conservation police officer, or investigator for 19the Secretary of State may elect to establish eligible 20creditable service for up to 10 years of service as a sheriff's 21law enforcement employee under Article 7, by filing a written 22election with the Board on or before January 31, 1993, and 23paying to the System by January 31, 1994 an amount to be 24determined by the Board, equal to (i) the difference between 25the amount of employee and employer contributions transferred 26to the System under Section 7-139.7, and the amounts that   SB1937 Engrossed- 71 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1would have been contributed had such contributions been made 2at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 3thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded 4annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.5    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 6policeman, conservation police officer, or investigator for 7the Secretary of State may elect to establish eligible 8creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a police 9officer under Article 3, a policeman under Article 5, a 10sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 7, a member 11of the county police department under Article 9, or a police 12officer under Article 15 by filing a written election with the 13Board and paying to the System an amount to be determined by 14the Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 15employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 16under Section 3-110.6, 5-236, 7-139.8, 9-121.10, or 15-134.4 17and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 18contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 19policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 20for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 21to the date of payment.22    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 23investigator for the Office of the Attorney General, or an 24investigator for the Department of Revenue, may elect to 25establish eligible creditable service for up to 5 years of 26service as a police officer under Article 3, a policeman under   SB1937 Engrossed- 72 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1Article 5, a sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 27, or a member of the county police department under Article 9 3by filing a written election with the Board within 6 months 4after August 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 596-745) and paying to the System an amount to be determined by 6the Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 7employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 8under Section 3-110.6, 5-236, 7-139.8, or 9-121.10 and the 9amounts that would have been contributed had such 10contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 11policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 12assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 13of service to the date of payment.14    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 15policeman, conservation police officer, investigator for the 16Office of the Attorney General, an investigator for the 17Department of Revenue, or investigator for the Secretary of 18State may elect to establish eligible creditable service for 19up to 5 years of service as a person employed by a 20participating municipality to perform police duties, or law 21enforcement officer employed on a full-time basis by a forest 22preserve district under Article 7, a county corrections 23officer, or a court services officer under Article 9, by 24filing a written election with the Board within 6 months after 25August 25, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 96-745) and 26paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board,   SB1937 Engrossed- 73 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 2employer contributions transferred to the System under 3Sections 7-139.8 and 9-121.10 and the amounts that would have 4been contributed had such contributions been made at the rates 5applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at 6the actuarially assumed rate for each year, compounded 7annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.8    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a State 9policeman, arson investigator, or Commerce Commission police 10officer may elect to establish eligible creditable service for 11up to 5 years of service as a person employed by a 12participating municipality to perform police duties under 13Article 7, a county corrections officer, a court services 14officer under Article 9, or a firefighter under Article 4 by 15filing a written election with the Board within 6 months after 16July 30, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and 17paying to the System an amount to be determined by the Board 18equal to (i) the difference between the amount of employee and 19employer contributions transferred to the System under 20Sections 4-108.8, 7-139.8, and 9-121.10 and the amounts that 21would have been contributed had such contributions been made 22at the rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) interest 23thereon at the actuarially assumed rate for each year, 24compounded annually, from the date of service to the date of 25payment. 26    Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a   SB1937 Engrossed- 74 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1conservation police officer may elect to establish eligible 2creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a person 3employed by a participating municipality to perform police 4duties under Article 7, a county corrections officer, or a 5court services officer under Article 9 by filing a written 6election with the Board within 6 months after July 30, 2021 7(the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and paying to the 8System an amount to be determined by the Board equal to (i) the 9difference between the amount of employee and employer 10contributions transferred to the System under Sections 7-139.8 11and 9-121.10 and the amounts that would have been contributed 12had such contributions been made at the rates applicable to 13State policemen, plus (ii) interest thereon at the actuarially 14assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 15of service to the date of payment. 16    Notwithstanding the limitation in subsection (i), a State 17policeman or conservation police officer may elect to convert 18service credit earned under this Article to eligible 19creditable service, as defined by this Section, by filing a 20written election with the board within 6 months after July 30, 212021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-210) and paying to 22the System an amount to be determined by the Board equal to (i) 23the difference between the amount of employee contributions 24originally paid for that service and the amounts that would 25have been contributed had such contributions been made at the 26rates applicable to State policemen, plus (ii) the difference   SB1937 Engrossed- 75 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1between the employer's normal cost of the credit prior to the 2conversion authorized by Public Act 102-210 and the employer's 3normal cost of the credit converted in accordance with Public 4Act 102-210, plus (iii) interest thereon at the actuarially 5assumed rate for each year, compounded annually, from the date 6of service to the date of payment. 7    (i) The total amount of eligible creditable service 8established by any person under subsections (g), (h), (j), 9(k), (l), (l-5), (o), and (p) of this Section shall not exceed 1012 years.11    (j) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 12investigator for the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 13Prosecutor or a controlled substance inspector may elect to 14establish eligible creditable service for up to 10 years of 15his service as a policeman under Article 3 or a sheriff's law 16enforcement employee under Article 7, by filing a written 17election with the Board, accompanied by payment of an amount 18to be determined by the Board, equal to (1) the difference 19between the amount of employee and employer contributions 20transferred to the System under Section 3-110.6 or 7-139.8, 21and the amounts that would have been contributed had such 22contributions been made at the rates applicable to State 23policemen, plus (2) interest thereon at the effective rate for 24each year, compounded annually, from the date of service to 25the date of payment.26    (k) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this   SB1937 Engrossed- 76 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1Section, an alternative formula employee may elect to 2establish eligible creditable service for periods spent as a 3full-time law enforcement officer or full-time corrections 4officer employed by the federal government or by a state or 5local government located outside of Illinois, for which credit 6is not held in any other public employee pension fund or 7retirement system. To obtain this credit, the applicant must 8file a written application with the Board by March 31, 1998, 9accompanied by evidence of eligibility acceptable to the Board 10and payment of an amount to be determined by the Board, equal 11to (1) employee contributions for the credit being 12established, based upon the applicant's salary on the first 13day as an alternative formula employee after the employment 14for which credit is being established and the rates then 15applicable to alternative formula employees, plus (2) an 16amount determined by the Board to be the employer's normal 17cost of the benefits accrued for the credit being established, 18plus (3) regular interest on the amounts in items (1) and (2) 19from the first day as an alternative formula employee after 20the employment for which credit is being established to the 21date of payment.22    (l) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 23security employee of the Department of Corrections may elect, 24not later than July 1, 1998, to establish eligible creditable 25service for up to 10 years of his or her service as a policeman 26under Article 3, by filing a written election with the Board,   SB1937 Engrossed- 77 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1accompanied by payment of an amount to be determined by the 2Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 3employee and employer contributions transferred to the System 4under Section 3-110.5, and the amounts that would have been 5contributed had such contributions been made at the rates 6applicable to security employees of the Department of 7Corrections, plus (ii) interest thereon at the effective rate 8for each year, compounded annually, from the date of service 9to the date of payment.10    (l-5) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i) of this 11Section, a State policeman may elect to establish eligible 12creditable service for up to 5 years of service as a full-time 13law enforcement officer employed by the federal government or 14by a state or local government located outside of Illinois for 15which credit is not held in any other public employee pension 16fund or retirement system. To obtain this credit, the 17applicant must file a written application with the Board no 18later than 3 years after January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 19Public Act 101-610), accompanied by evidence of eligibility 20acceptable to the Board and payment of an amount to be 21determined by the Board, equal to (1) employee contributions 22for the credit being established, based upon the applicant's 23salary on the first day as an alternative formula employee 24after the employment for which credit is being established and 25the rates then applicable to alternative formula employees, 26plus (2) an amount determined by the Board to be the employer's   SB1937 Engrossed- 78 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1normal cost of the benefits accrued for the credit being 2established, plus (3) regular interest on the amounts in items 3(1) and (2) from the first day as an alternative formula 4employee after the employment for which credit is being 5established to the date of payment. 6    (m) The amendatory changes to this Section made by Public 7Act 94-696 apply only to: (1) security employees of the 8Department of Juvenile Justice employed by the Department of 9Corrections before June 1, 2006 (the effective date of Public 10Act 94-696) and transferred to the Department of Juvenile 11Justice by Public Act 94-696; and (2) persons employed by the 12Department of Juvenile Justice on or after June 1, 2006 (the 13effective date of Public Act 94-696) who are required by 14subsection (b) of Section 3-2.5-15 of the Unified Code of 15Corrections to have any bachelor's or advanced degree from an 16accredited college or university or, in the case of persons 17who provide vocational training, who are required to have 18adequate knowledge in the skill for which they are providing 19the vocational training. 20    (n) A person employed in a position under subsection (b) 21of this Section who has purchased service credit under 22subsection (j) of Section 14-104 or subsection (b) of Section 2314-105 in any other capacity under this Article may convert up 24to 5 years of that service credit into service credit covered 25under this Section by paying to the Fund an amount equal to (1) 26the additional employee contribution required under Section   SB1937 Engrossed- 79 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b114-133, plus (2) the additional employer contribution required 2under Section 14-131, plus (3) interest on items (1) and (2) at 3the actuarially assumed rate from the date of the service to 4the date of payment. 5    (o) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), a 6conservation police officer, investigator for the Secretary of 7State, Commerce Commission police officer, investigator for 8the Department of Revenue or the Illinois Gaming Board, or 9arson investigator subject to subsection (g) of Section 1-160 10may elect to convert up to 8 years of service credit 11established before January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 12Public Act 101-610) as a conservation police officer, 13investigator for the Secretary of State, Commerce Commission 14police officer, investigator for the Department of Revenue or 15the Illinois Gaming Board, or arson investigator under this 16Article into eligible creditable service by filing a written 17election with the Board no later than one year after January 1, 182020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-610), accompanied 19by payment of an amount to be determined by the Board equal to 20(i) the difference between the amount of the employee 21contributions actually paid for that service and the amount of 22the employee contributions that would have been paid had the 23employee contributions been made as a noncovered employee 24serving in a position in which eligible creditable service, as 25defined in this Section, may be earned, plus (ii) interest 26thereon at the effective rate for each year, compounded   SB1937 Engrossed- 80 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.2    (p) Subject to the limitation in subsection (i), an 3investigator for the Office of the Attorney General subject to 4subsection (g) of Section 1-160 may elect to convert up to 8 5years of service credit established before the effective date 6of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly as an 7investigator for the Office of the Attorney General under this 8Article into eligible creditable service by filing a written 9election with the Board no later than one year after the 10effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 11Assembly, accompanied by payment of an amount to be determined 12by the Board equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 13the employee contributions actually paid for that service and 14the amount of the employee contributions that would have been 15paid had the employee contributions been made as a noncovered 16employee serving in a position in which eligible creditable 17service, as defined in this Section, may be earned, plus (ii) 18interest thereon at the effective rate for each year, 19compounded annually, from the date of service to the date of 20payment. 21(Source: P.A. 102-210, eff. 7-30-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 22102-956, eff. 5-27-22; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24.) 23    (40 ILCS 5/14-152.1)24    Sec. 14-152.1. Application and expiration of new benefit 25increases.  SB1937 Engrossed- 81 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1    (a) As used in this Section, "new benefit increase" means 2an increase in the amount of any benefit provided under this 3Article, or an expansion of the conditions of eligibility for 4any benefit under this Article, that results from an amendment 5to this Code that takes effect after June 1, 2005 (the 6effective date of Public Act 94-4). "New benefit increase", 7however, does not include any benefit increase resulting from 8the changes made to Article 1 or this Article by Public Act 996-37, Public Act 100-23, Public Act 100-587, Public Act 10100-611, Public Act 101-10, Public Act 101-610, Public Act 11102-210, Public Act 102-856, Public Act 102-956, or this 12amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly this amendatory 13Act of the 102nd General Assembly. 14    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code or 15any subsequent amendment to this Code, every new benefit 16increase is subject to this Section and shall be deemed to be 17granted only in conformance with and contingent upon 18compliance with the provisions of this Section. 19    (c) The Public Act enacting a new benefit increase must 20identify and provide for payment to the System of additional 21funding at least sufficient to fund the resulting annual 22increase in cost to the System as it accrues.23    Every new benefit increase is contingent upon the General 24Assembly providing the additional funding required under this 25subsection. The Commission on Government Forecasting and 26Accountability shall analyze whether adequate additional   SB1937 Engrossed- 82 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1funding has been provided for the new benefit increase and 2shall report its analysis to the Public Pension Division of 3the Department of Insurance. A new benefit increase created by 4a Public Act that does not include the additional funding 5required under this subsection is null and void. If the Public 6Pension Division determines that the additional funding 7provided for a new benefit increase under this subsection is 8or has become inadequate, it may so certify to the Governor and 9the State Comptroller and, in the absence of corrective action 10by the General Assembly, the new benefit increase shall expire 11at the end of the fiscal year in which the certification is 12made. 13    (d) Every new benefit increase shall expire 5 years after 14its effective date or on such earlier date as may be specified 15in the language enacting the new benefit increase or provided 16under subsection (c). This does not prevent the General 17Assembly from extending or re-creating a new benefit increase 18by law.19    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the language creating 20the new benefit increase, a new benefit increase that expires 21under this Section continues to apply to persons who applied 22and qualified for the affected benefit while the new benefit 23increase was in effect and to the affected beneficiaries and 24alternate payees of such persons, but does not apply to any 25other person, including, without limitation, a person who 26continues in service after the expiration date and did not   SB1937 Engrossed- 83 -LRB104 09509 RPS 19572 b1apply and qualify for the affected benefit while the new 2benefit increase was in effect.3(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 4101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-210, eff. 7-30-21; 102-856, eff. 51-1-23; 102-956, eff. 5-27-22.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.